Washington statutes.
RCW 43.388.020

Washington state leadership board account—Washington state leadership board special license plate account.

(1) The Washington state leadership board account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriations must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this chapter.

(2)(a) The Washington state leadership board special license plate account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from special license plate disposition under RCW 46.68.420 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this chapter. Only the executive director of the Washington state leadership board or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(b) The Washington state leadership board special license plate account may accept gifts, grants, or endowments from public and private sources that are made in trust or otherwise for the use and benefit of the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2022 c 96 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2022 c 96: See notes following RCW 43.388.010.